Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201960-547
Bond; proof of financial responsibility.

Proof of financial responsibility may be evidenced by the bond of a surety company duly authorized to transact business within this state, or a bond with at least two individual sureties who each own real estate within this state, which real estate shall be scheduled in the bond approved by a judge of a court of record. The bond shall be conditioned for the payment of the amounts specified in subdivision (14) of section 60-501. It shall be filed with the department and shall not be cancelable except after ten days' written notice to the department. Such bond shall constitute a lien in favor of the state upon the real estate so scheduled of any surety, which lien shall exist in favor of any holder of a final judgment against the person who has filed such bond, for damages, including damages for care and loss of services, because of bodily injury to or death of any person, or for damages because of injury to or destruction of property, including the loss of use thereof, resulting from the ownership, maintenance, use, or operation of a motor vehicle after such bond was filed, upon the filing of notice to that effect by the department in the office of the register of deeds of the county where such real estate shall be located.

Laws 1949, c. 178, § 47, p. 498;

Laws 2010, LB650, § 34;

Laws 2011, LB289, § 28;

Laws 2012, LB1155, § 17;

Laws 2019, LB156, § 15.
September 1, 2019